Utah statutes.
70A-5-116.   Choice of law and forum.
(1)  The liability of an issuer, nominated person, or adviser for action or
omission is governed by the law of the jurisdiction chosen by an agreement in
the form of a record signed or otherwise authenticated by the affected parties
in the manner provided in Section 70A-5-104 or by a provision in the person's
letter of credit, confirmation, or other undertaking.  The jurisdiction whose
law is chosen need not bear any relation to the transaction.
(2)  Unless Subsection (1) applies, the liability of an issuer, nominated
person, or adviser for action or omission is governed by the law of the
jurisdiction in which the person is located.  The person is considered to be
located at the address indicated in the person's undertaking.  If more than
one address is indicated, the person is considered to be located at the
address from which the person's undertaking was issued.  For the purpose of
jurisdiction, choice of law, and recognition of interbranch letters of credit,
but not enforcement of a judgment, all branches of a bank are considered
separate juridical entities and a bank is considered to be located at the
place where its relevant branch is considered to be located under this
Subsection (2).
(3) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this Subsection (3)(a), the liability
of an issuer, nominated person, or adviser is governed by any rules of custom
or practice, such as the Uniform Customs and Practice for Documentary Credits,
to which the letter of credit, confirmation, or other undertaking is expressly
made subject.
(b)  If this chapter would govern the liability of an issuer, nominated
person, or adviser under Subsection (1) or (2):
(i)  the relevant undertaking incorporates rules of custom or practice; and
(ii)  there is conflict between this chapter and those rules as applied to
that undertaking, those rules govern except to the extent of any conflict with
the nonvariable provisions specified in Subsection 70A-5-103(3).
(4)  If there is conflict between this chapter and Title 70A, Chapter 3,
Commercial Paper, Chapter 4, Bank Deposits and Collections, Chapter 4a, Funds
Transfers, or Chapter 9a, Secured Transactions, this chapter governs.
(5)  The forum for settling disputes arising out of an undertaking within this
chapter may be chosen in the manner and with the binding effect that governing
law may be chosen in accordance with Subsection (1).
